Utah statutes.
19-3-202.   Practices of party states regarding low-level waste shipments -- Fees for inspections.

(1)  Each party state agrees to adopt practices which will require low-level waste shipments originating within its borders and destined for a facility within another party state to conform to the applicable packaging and transportation requirements and regulations of the host state including:

(a)  maintaining an inventory of all generators within the state that have shipped or expect to ship low-level waste to facilities in another party state;

(b)  periodic unannounced inspection of the premises of the generators and the waste management activities on the premises;

(c)  authorization of the containers in which the waste may be shipped, and a requirement that generators use only the type of containers authorized by the state;

(d)  assurance that inspections of the carriers which transport the waste are conducted by proper authorities, and appropriate enforcement action taken for violations; and

(e)  after receiving notification from a host state that a generator within the party state is in violation of applicable packaging or transportation standards,  taking appropriate action to assure that the violations do not recur including the inspection of every individual low-level waste shipment by that generator.

(2)  Each party state may impose fees upon generators and shippers to recover the cost of the inspections and other practices under this compact.

(3)  Nothing in this section limits any party state's authority to impose additional or more stringent standards on generators or carriers than those required under this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

